Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Bond and Insurance.

Sec. 08.18.071.
Bond required.

Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this section, each applicant shall, at the time of applying for a certificate of registration, file with the commissioner a surety bond running to the state conditioned upon the applicant’s promise to pay all

taxes and contributions due the state and political subdivisions;

persons furnishing labor or material or renting or supplying equipment to the applicant; and

amounts that may be adjudged against the applicant by reason of negligent or improper work or breach of contract in the conduct of the contracting business or home inspection activity, as applicable, or by reason of damage to public facilities occurring in the course of a construction project.

The amount of the bond for a

general contractor shall be $25,000;

general contractor with a residential contractor endorsement under AS

08.18.025

who performs exclusively residential work shall be $20,000;

mechanical or specialty contractor or home inspector shall be $10,000; or

contractor whose work on one project with an aggregate contract price of $10,000 or less, including all labor, materials, and other items, when the work is not part of a larger or major operation or otherwise divided into contracts of less than $10,000 to evade a higher bonding requirement, shall be $5,000.

The bond required by this section remains in effect until cancelled by action of the surety, the principal, or the commissioner. An action may not be commenced upon the bond later than three years after its cancellation. In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the applicant may file with the commissioner a cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable to the commissioner in the amount specified for bonds.

A general contractor or specialty contractor who is in compliance with the surety bond or deposit requirements of (a) and (b) of this section is not required to file another surety bond or increase a deposit with the commissioner when the general contractor or specialty contractor applies to be a registered home inspector. However, if the general contractor or specialty contractor subsequently is neither a general contractor nor a specialty contractor and becomes only a registered home inspector, the home inspector shall provide a surety bond or deposit in lieu of the bond in the manner and amount required for registered home inspectors under this section.

An applicant for, or holder of, a certificate of registration as a home inspector may, in lieu of filing with the commissioner a surety bond or deposit that meets the requirements of this section, file evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that the applicant is employed by a registered home inspector who is in compliance with the surety bond or deposit requirements of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 132 SLA 1988; am §§ 14, 15 ch 134 SLA 2003; am §§ 3, 4 ch 106 SLA 2004; am §§ 2, 3 ch 70 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to immediate or delayed applicability of the 2014 amendments to subsection (b) to persons see sec. 6, ch. 70, SLA 2014.

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote (b), which read, “If the applicant is a general contractor, the amount of the bond shall be $10,000; if the applicant is a mechanical or specialty contractor or home inspector, the amount of the bond shall be $5,000. In lieu of the surety bond, the applicant may file with the commissioner a cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable to the commissioner in the amount specified for bonds.”; in (c), added the third sentence.

Sec. 08.18.080.
Inspection or investigation by board. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.081.
Claims against contractor or home inspector.

Except as provided in AS

08.18.085

, a person having a claim against a contractor or home inspector for any of the items referred to in AS

08.18.071

may bring suit upon the bond in the district court of the judicial district in which venue lies. A copy of the complaint shall be served by registered or certified mail upon the commissioner at the time suit is filed, and the commissioner shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits commenced. Two additional copies shall be served upon the director of the division of insurance with the payment to the director of a fee set under AS

21.06.250

, taxable as costs in the action. This service upon the director shall constitute service on the surety, and the director shall transmit the complaint or a copy of it to the surety within 72 hours after it has been received. The surety upon the bond is not liable in an aggregate amount in excess of that named in the bond, but in case claims pending at any one time exceed the amount of the bond, the claims shall be satisfied from the bond in the following order:

labor, including employee benefits;

taxes and contributions due the state, city, and borough, in that order;

material and equipment;

claims for breach of contract;

repair of public facilities.

If a judgment is entered against the cash deposit, the commissioner, upon receipt of a certified copy of a final judgment, shall pay the judgment from the amount of the deposit, in accordance with the priorities set out in (a) of this section.

If the claim for which a person may bring suit under (a) of this section is subject to AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

, the person may not bring suit unless the person complies with AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 9 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

Sec. 08.18.085.
Legal actions against home inspector.

Notwithstanding contrary provisions of AS

08.18.081

or AS 09.10, a person may not bring an action against an individual registered under this chapter based on a home inspection report unless the action is commenced within one year.

The limitation in (a) of this section applies to all actions based on a home inspection report, regardless of whether the action is based on breach of contract, personal injury or death, property damage, or another source of liability except that (a) of this section is not applicable to an action based on gross negligence or intentional misconduct by the home inspector. The limitation may not be waived by contract.

A person may not bring an action against an individual registered under this chapter for damages that arise from an act or omission relating to a home inspection performed by the individual unless the person

was a party to the real estate transaction for which the home inspection was conducted;

received the home inspection report with the written consent of the party for whom the home inspection was originally performed; or

acquired the property for which the home inspection report was conducted by inheritance or bequest from a person who could have brought an action under (1) or (2) of this subsection.

Contractual provisions that purport to limit the liability of a home inspector to the cost of the home inspection report are contrary to public policy and void.

History.

(§ 17 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.18.090.
Regulations of the board. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.091.
Cancellation of bond.

This chapter does not impair the right of a bonding company to cancel its bond of a contractor for lawful reasons.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968)

Sec. 08.18.100.
License required. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.101.
Insurance required.

Each applicant, at the time of applying for registration or upon renewal of registration, shall file with the commissioner satisfactory evidence that the applicant has in effect

to the extent required under AS 23.30, workers’ compensation insurance that is purchased from a private insurer who is admitted to do business in the state and that shows coverage in this state, appropriate employee classifications, and rates applicable in this state, or a valid workers’ compensation self-insurance certificate issued by the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board; and

public liability and property damage insurance covering the applicant’s contracting operations in this state in the sum of not less than $20,000 for damage to property, $50,000 for injury, including death, to any one person, and $100,000 for injury, including death, to more than one person; this requirement does not apply to an applicant whose contracting operations are for work on projects where each project has an aggregate contract price, including all labor, materials, and other items of $2,500 or less.

Proof of insurance coverage for an applicant under (a) of this section may be satisfied by providing evidence that the applicant is covered by a policy in effect for the applicant’s employer at least to the extent required under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 121 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 70 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (a)(2), added the language beginning “; this requirement does not apply” to the end of the paragraph.

Sec. 08.18.110.
Classification of licenses. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.111.
Advertising bond and insurance.

Contractors and home inspectors may not advertise that they are bonded and insured simply because they have complied with the bond and insurance requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 18 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.18.115.
Return of cash deposit.

A contractor or home inspector who has filed a cash deposit and who ceases doing business as a contractor or home inspector may request the return of as much of that cash deposit as is held by the commissioner by

filing a notarized statement with the commissioner that the contractor or home inspector has ceased doing business as a contractor or home inspector, as applicable; and

filing a notarized statement with the commissioner at least three years after filing the statement in (1) of this subsection that

requests return of the cash deposit;

certifies that the former contractor or home inspector has not been engaged in business as a contractor or home inspector, as applicable, for at least three years; and

certifies that to the best of the contractor’s or home inspector’s knowledge no action has been commenced upon the cash deposit that has not been dismissed or reduced to a final judgment that has been satisfied.

The commissioner, after paying any judgments against the cash deposit under AS

08.18.081(b)

, shall return the remainder of a former contractor’s or former home inspector’s cash deposit to the contractor or home inspector, as applicable, if

the former contractor or former home inspector has complied with (a) of this section; and

no action has been commenced upon the cash deposit that has not been dismissed or reduced to a final judgment that has been satisfied.

History.

(§ 2 ch 15 SLA 1977; am § 19 ch 134 SLA 2003)